Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2449.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 6791YH (3) 91 jda/jh H.F. 2449 Section 1. Section 279.12, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. The board may enter into an agreement pursuant to chapter 3 28E with another school district or an area education agency , 4 city, or county for the purpose of jointly procuring a group 5 health insurance plan, nonprofit group hospital service plan, 6 nonprofit group medical service plan, or group life insurance 7 plan for the benefit of the districts or agencies which are 8 parties to the agreement. Such plan may include a cafeteria 9 plan as defined in 26 C.F.R. Â§1.125-2T . An agreement entered 10 into pursuant to this subsection shall not be construed to 11 establish a multiple employer welfare arrangement as defined in 12 section 3 of the federal Employee Retirement Income Security 13 Act of 1974, 29 U.S.C. Â§1002, paragraph 40. 14